Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska26-207
No-contact period; violation; arrest, when.

A law enforcement officer shall, with or without a warrant, arrest a person if the officer has probable cause to believe that the person has committed a violation of section 26-202.

Laws 2026, LB935, § 32.
January 1, 2027